Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 8 POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS
§ 31-847. Leave of absence to officers.

The board of commissioners may grant to any county officer of their respective counties leave of absence from their county and the state, for a period not exceeding ninety (90) days, during which time the absence of such officer does not work forfeiture of his office; provided, that before the granting of such leave of absence, the officer (except county commissioners) must appoint a deputy to perform the duties of his office, as by statute in such cases made and provided, and must present to, and file with, the board of commissioners of his county the written consent of each person liable on his official bond, that such leave of absence be granted; be it further provided, that no leave of absence shall be granted to more than any one (1) county commissioner at the same time; providing, however, that where any elective or appointive county officer is required to absent himself by reason of being a member of the armed forces of the nation or by reason of official call to service in civilian war work, such period of absence shall not exceed the date of the next succeeding general election, such absence shall not work forfeiture of the office of such officer, and such absence shall suspend the salary of such officer during such period, except that the board may adopt a policy by which such officer may, for periods of absence not to exceed four (4) weeks per year, receive his or her regular salary reduced by an amount equal to any monetary compensation received for the performance of such military or civilian war work. For purposes of this section, appointive county officers do not include deputies appointed pursuant to section 31-2003, Idaho Code.

§ 31-848 — 31-854. Fireguard — Alterations and repairs — Camp fire notice — Wires crossing railroad tracks — Orders to change wires — Disobedience. [Repealed.]

§ 31-855. Neglect of duty by commissioners.

Any commissioner who neglects or refuses, without just cause therefor, to perform any duty imposed on him, or who willfully violates any law provided for his government as such officer, or fraudulently or corruptly performs any duty imposed on him, or willfully, fraudulently or corruptly attempts to perform an act, as commissioner, unauthorized by law, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 31-856. Migratory labor housing — Cooperation with federal government.

The county commissioners may cooperate in any plan providing for the furnishing of housing, lands, labor and material and other assistance in the program sponsored by the United States of America pertaining to migratory labor by making agreements with the United States of America through the United States Department of Agriculture, its cooperating agencies, or any other agency of the United States of America, with reference to providing facilities, labor, materials or funds to carry forward said program.

§ 31-857. School, road, herd and other districts — Presumption of validity of creation or dissolution.

Whenever any school district, road district, herd district, or other district has heretofore been, or shall hereafter be, declared to be created, established, disestablished, dissolved, or modified, by an order of the board of county commissioners in any county of the state of Idaho, a legal prima facie presumption is hereby declared to exist, after a lapse of two (2) years from the date of such order, that all proceedings and jurisdictional steps preceding the making of such order have been properly and regularly taken so as to warrant said board in making said order, and the burden of proof shall rest upon the party who shall deny, dispute, or question the validity of said order to show that any of such preceding proceedings or jurisdictional steps were not properly or regularly taken; and such prima facie presumption shall be a rule of evidence in all courts in the state of Idaho. No challenge to the proceedings or jurisdictional steps preceding such an order, shall be heard or considered after seven (7) years has [have] lapsed from the date of the order.

§ 31-858 — 31-861. Military or naval reservations restricted areas — Violations of restricted areas — Excepted cities, towns and villages from restrictions. [Repealed.]

§ 31-862. Authorizing special tax to be used solely and exclusively for preventive health services.

The board of county commissioners is hereby authorized to levy a special tax not to exceed four hundredths per cent (.04%) of market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property in the county, above the statutory limitation, to be expended solely and exclusively for preventive health services by county or district boards of health.

§ 31-863. Levy for charities fund.

For the purpose of nonmedical indigent assistance pursuant to chapter 34, title 31, Idaho Code, and for the purpose of providing financial assistance on behalf of the medically indigent, pursuant to chapter 35, title 31, Idaho Code, said boards are authorized to levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed ten hundredths of one percent (.10%) of the market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property in the county.

§ 31-864. Historical societies and museums — Support by county.

The board of county commissioners of any county may expend annually such amounts as necessary for the support of county or local historical societies which are incorporated as Idaho nonprofit corporations and which operate primarily within the county, or for the support of museums or of historical restoration projects within the county undertaken or operated by Idaho nonprofit organizations, or for the marking and development of historic sites by Idaho nonprofit corporations. For the purposes of this section, the board of county commissioners of any county is authorized and empowered to levy not more than twelve one-thousandths percent (.012%) on each dollar of market value for assessment purposes of taxable property within the county.

Before money is granted under this section, the directors of such nonprofit corporations shall present to the county commissioners a proposed budget which shall indicate anticipated revenues and expenditures of the nonprofit corporation (including the sums requested from the county), and shall indicate the purposes of the proposed expenditures. The board of county commissioners may require an audit of the accounts and financial records of any such nonprofit corporations receiving county funds.

§ 31-865. Budgeting and auditing of funds. [Repealed.]

§ 31-866. Contracts for public benefit — Designated grantee.

The boards of county commissioners in their respective counties shall have the authority and power to enter into contracts with private nonprofit corporations to promote, maintain, and administer projects and programs that the board of county commissioners considers to be of public benefit, and the purpose of which is to carry on programs concerning the aged.

The board of county commissioners may become the designated grantee and receive funding to sponsor, promote and administer such public activities as they may deem beneficial.

§ 31-867. Special levy for courts — District court fund.

The board of county commissioners of each county in this state may levy annually upon all taxable property of its county, a special tax not to exceed four hundredths per cent (.04%) of market value for assessment purposes for the purpose of providing for the functions of the district court and the magistrate division of the district court within the county. All revenues collected from such special tax shall be paid into the “district court fund,” which is hereby created, and the board may appropriate otherwise unappropriated moneys into the district court fund. Moneys in the district court fund may be expended for all court expenditures other than courthouse construction and remodeling.

Balances in the district court fund may be accumulated from year to year sufficient to operate the court functions on a cash basis, but such balances shall not exceed sixty per cent (60%) of the total budget for court functions for the current year.

There is hereby created the county court facilities fund which may be established in each county by resolution adopted at a public meeting of the board of county commissioners. Moneys in the county court facilities fund shall be expended for planning, remodeling and construction of court facilities. The county court facilities fund shall be separate and distinct from the county current expense fund and county expenditures from the county court facilities fund shall be solely dedicated to the purposes set forth in this section [subsection]. At the discretion of the board of county commissioners, funds deposited in the county court facilities fund may be accumulated from year to year or expended on a regular basis.

§ 31-868. Contracts for fire protection.

The boards of county commissioners in their respective counties shall have the authority and power to enter into contracts with a city or a fire protection district for the provision of fire or life protection services, or both of them, in areas of the county not otherwise receiving fire or life protection.

§ 31-869. Development of energy systems.

The boards of county commissioners of their respective counties are empowered to establish, create, develop, own, maintain and operate or contract for the ownership, operation and maintenance of energy facilities as follows:

Geothermal energy systems for heating for the benefit of the county and the residents of the county.

Electrical generation plants not to exceed twenty-five (25) megawatts in capacity which use as a fuel source landfill gas, wood waste or other biomass fuels. All the electricity produced from the electrical generation facility shall be sold by the county at wholesale.

§ 31-870. Fees for county services.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a board of county commissioners may impose and collect fees for those services provided by the county which would otherwise be funded by ad valorem tax revenues. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be reasonably related to, but shall not exceed, the actual cost of the service being rendered. Taxing districts other than counties may impose fees for services as provided in section 63-1311, Idaho Code.

The board of county commissioners may establish and provide for the collection of a solid waste fee in accordance with a request made pursuant to this section, and such fee shall be certified and collected in the same manner provided by law for the collection of real or personal property taxes.

The administrative fee authorized under the provisions of this section and collected for issuance of motor vehicle registrations pursuant to chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be the same for any registration issued pursuant to section 49-402B, Idaho Code, and may not be doubled or in any way increased solely because of registration under that section.

This section shall not apply to the issuance or renewal of licenses to carry concealed weapons under sections 18-3302, 18-3302H or 18-3302K, Idaho Code.

§ 31-871. Classification and retention of records.

County records shall be classified as follows:

“Law enforcement media recording” means a digital record created by a law enforcement agency in the performance of its duties that consists of a recording of visual or audible components or both.

“Permanent records” shall consist of, but not be limited to, the following: proceedings of the governing body, ordinances, resolutions, building plans and specifications for commercial projects and government buildings, bond register, warrant register, budget records, general ledger, cash books and records affecting the title to real property or liens thereon, and other documents or records as may be deemed of permanent nature by the board of county commissioners.

“Semipermanent records” shall consist of, but not be limited to, the following: claims, contracts, canceled checks, warrants, duplicate warrants, license applications, building applications for commercial projects and government buildings, departmental reports, purchase orders, vouchers, duplicate receipts, bonds and coupons, financial records, and other documents or records as may be deemed of semipermanent nature by the board of county commissioners.

“Temporary records” shall consist of, but not be limited to, the following: correspondence not related to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, building applications, plans, and specifications for noncommercial and nongovernment projects after the structure or project receives final inspection and approval, cash receipts subject to audit, and other records as may be deemed temporary by the board of county commissioners.

Those records not included in paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this subsection shall be classified as permanent, semipermanent or temporary by the board of county commissioners and upon the advice of the office of the prosecuting attorney.

County records shall be retained as follows:

Permanent records shall be retained for not less than ten (10) years.

Semipermanent records shall be kept for not less than five (5) years after date of issuance or completion of the matter contained within the record.

Temporary records shall be retained for not less than two (2) years.

Law enforcement media recordings with evidentiary value shall be retained for not less than two hundred (200) days from the date the recording was made.

Law enforcement media recordings that have no evidentiary value and that are recorded by the law enforcement agency’s equipment that is not affixed to any building or structure’s interior or exterior wall shall be retained for not less than sixty (60) days from the date the recording was made.

Law enforcement media recordings that have no evidentiary value and that are recorded by the law enforcement agency’s equipment that is affixed to any building or structure’s interior or exterior wall shall be retained for not less than fourteen (14) days from the date the recording was made.

Records may be destroyed only by resolution of the board of county commissioners after regular audit and upon the advice of the prosecuting attorney, except that law enforcement media recordings may be destroyed without a resolution. A resolution ordering destruction must list, in detail, records to be destroyed. Such disposition shall be under the direction and supervision of the elected official or department head responsible for such records.
(h) The provisions of this section shall control the classification, retention and destruction of all county records unless otherwise provided in Idaho Code or any applicable federal law.

As used in this section:

“Evidentiary value” means containing information relevant to:

Any use of force by a government agency;

Any events leading up to and including an arrest or citation for a criminal offense;

Any events that constitute a criminal offense;

Any encounter about which a complaint has been filed by a subject, or his representative, of the law enforcement media recording; or

Any encounter about which a valid public records request has been filed by a subject, or his representative, of the law enforcement media recording.

“Law enforcement agency” means a county agency given law enforcement powers or that has authority to investigate, enforce, prosecute or punish violators of state or federal criminal statutes, ordinances or regulations including a county sheriff’s office, a county prosecuting attorney’s office, and misdemeanor and juvenile probation offices. “Law enforcement agency” shall include any private entity contracting with a county to provide the services of a law enforcement agency.

“Valid public records request” means a request as described in section 74-102, Idaho Code.

§ 31-871A. Retention of county records using photographic and digital media.

A county official may reproduce and retain documents in a photographic, digital or other nonpaper medium. The medium in which a document is retained shall accurately reproduce the document in paper form during the period for which the document must be retained and shall preclude unauthorized alteration of the document.

If the medium chosen for retention is photographic, all film used must meet the quality standards of the American national standards institute (ANSI).

If the medium chosen for retention is digital, the medium must provide for reproduction on paper at a resolution of at least two hundred (200) dots per inch.

A document retained by the county in any form or medium permitted under this section shall be deemed an original public record for all purposes. A reproduction or copy of such a document, certified by the county official, shall be deemed to be a transcript or certified copy of the original and shall be admissible before any court or administrative hearing.

Once a paper document is retained in a nonpaper medium as authorized by this section, the original paper document may be disposed of or returned to the sender.

Whenever any record is reproduced by photographic or digital process as herein provided, it shall be made in duplicate, and the custodian thereof shall place one (1) copy in a fire-resistant vault, or off-site storage facility, and he shall retain the other copy in his office with suitable equipment for displaying such record at not less than original size and for making copies of the record.

§ 31-872. Regulation of firearms

Control by state. [Repealed.]

§ 31-873. Reimbursement for certain medical assistance payments.

For the purpose of assisting counties with their medical indigency claims, state participation in the federal medical assistance (medicaid) program under title XIX of the social security act, as amended, shall be expanded to match federal funds for coverage of services as defined by section 56-209d, Idaho Code.

Boards of county commissioners shall safeguard all provided information as provided for in section 1902(a)(7) of the social security act, 42 CFR 431.300 through 431.307 and sections 56-221 and 56-222, Idaho Code.

§ 31-874. Proceedings and records of medical indigents.

All proceedings and records related to medical indigency pursuant to the provisions of section 31-873, Idaho Code, and chapters 34 and 35, title 31, Idaho Code, shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, and shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.

§ 31-875. Computerized mapping system fees.

As used in this section, “computerized mapping system” or “system” means the digital storage, processing and retrieval of cadastral information derived from local government records and related information such as land use, topography, water, streets and geographic features.

In a county which develops a computerized mapping system, the board of county commissioners may impose and collect fees from the users of this system for the development, maintenance and dissemination of digital forms of the system. These fees shall not exceed the actual costs of development, annual maintenance and dissemination of the computerized mapping system. These fees shall not apply to paper maps produced from the computerized mapping system.

§ 31-876. Public transportation services.

The boards of county commissioners in their respective counties shall have the authority to establish, fund and operate public transportation services that the board of county commissioners considers to be of public benefit.

Public transportation services include, without limitation, fixed transit routes; scheduled or unscheduled transit service; paratransit services for the elderly, disabled or other persons dependent on public transportation; shuttle and commuter services between cities, counties, health care facilities, employment centers, educational institutions and park-and-ride locations; subscription van and car-pooling services; and transportation services unique to social service programs.

The board of county commissioners may become the designated grantee and receive funding from other federal, state, local and private sources and use said funds for the sponsorship, promotion and administration of such public transportation services as they may deem beneficial.

§ 31-877. Water and sewer services.

The boards of county commissioners in their respective counties shall have the authority to provide necessary water and sewer services to any part of the county which does not receive water and sewer services, or any part of the county where a water and sewer or a water or sewer district has been dissolved pursuant to chapter 41, title 63, Idaho Code. For purposes of this section, a board of county commissioners shall have the authority granted to water and sewer districts pursuant to chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, and the authority granted to municipalities pursuant to the provisions of title 50, Idaho Code.

§ 31-878. Misdemeanor probation services.

The board of county commissioners shall provide for misdemeanor probation services to supervise misdemeanor offenders, in those cases where such probation supervision has been ordered by the sentencing court, and perform such functions as prescribed by the administrative district judge in each judicial district. The board of county commissioners shall provide for misdemeanor probation services through employment of staff, contract or any other process that will accomplish the purposes of this section. Counties shall not be obligated to provide misdemeanor probation services beyond the funds generated by the fees collected pursuant to the provisions of section 31-3201D, Idaho Code, and any additional funds that may be annually appropriated by the board of county commissioners.

§ 31-879. Waiver of right to magistrate judge.

The board of county commissioners shall have the authority to adopt by majority vote a resolution waiving the right to a resident magistrate judge to which the county would otherwise be entitled pursuant to section 1-2205, Idaho Code. When a board of county commissioners has adopted such a resolution, and has not subsequently rescinded such resolution, the district magistrates commission for the judicial district in which the county is located is not required to appoint a resident magistrate judge for that county.

§ 31-880. Pretrial release supervision services.

The board of county commissioners may establish a supervised pretrial release program to perform those functions as prescribed by the administrative district judge in each judicial district. The board of county commissioners may provide for supervised pretrial release services through employment of staff, contract, or any other process that will accomplish the purposes of this section. A board of county commissioners shall not be obligated to establish a supervised pretrial release program. Counties having established a supervised pretrial release program shall not be obligated to provide supervised pretrial release services beyond the funds generated by the fees collected pursuant to the provisions of section 31-3201J, Idaho Code, and any additional funds that may be annually appropriated by the board of county commissioners.